Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB224.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1103(g) of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1103. Restricted activities.* * *(g) Former official or employee.--No former public official or public employee shall represent a person, with promised or actual compensation, on any matter before the governmental body with which he has been associated for [one year] two years after he leaves that body.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516